n11.dix
<pardef n="AcaraNeV/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vaniweV/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yaru</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yarannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgiV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yarigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigAgiV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yaralli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yareV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="BUwaceRteV"><i>BUwaceRteV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="akarAsweV"><i>akarAsweV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vEcArikaweV"><i>vEcArikaweV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyAKyeV"><i>vyAKyeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SilubeV"><i>SilubeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aMceV"><i>aMceV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ageV"><i>ageV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="areV"><i>areV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aNeV"><i>aNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aleV"><i>aleV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="udikeV"><i>udikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="asaddeV"><i>asaddeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="AjFeV"><i>AjFeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ArogaNeV"><i>ArogaNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ASvAsaneV"><i>ASvAsaneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ilAKeV"><i>ilAKeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="uwpAxaneV"><i>uwpAxaneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ubbateV"><i>ubbateV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="UheV"><i>UheV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="eVmakeV"><i>eVmakeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="binnavawwalYeV"><i>binnavawwalYeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bUtAtikeV"><i>bUtAtikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="boVMbeV"><i>boVMbeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BaravaseV"><i>BaravaseV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maMcigeV"><i>maMcigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maNeV"><i>maNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mannaNeV"><i>mannaNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwqBAReV"><i>mAwqBAReV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="middeV"><i>middeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muccalYikeV"><i>muccalYikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mUDanaMbikeV"><i>mUDanaMbikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="meVravaNigeV"><i>meVravaNigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="moVgeV"><i>moVgeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="moxageV"><i>moxageV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rakRaNeV"><i>rakRaNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rasavixyeV"><i>rasavixyeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="reVppeV"><i>reVppeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="laddugeV"><i>laddugeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="leNeV"><i>leNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vadeV"><i>vadeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAtikeV"><i>vAtikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vijFApaneV"><i>vijFApaneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="viRagalYigeV"><i>viRagalYigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vExyaSAleV"><i>vExyaSAleV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SilubeV"><i>SilubeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMGataneV"><i>saMGataneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMSoXaneV"><i>saMSoXaneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sappeV"><i>sappeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahiRNuweV"><i>sahiRNuweV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sArWakaweV"><i>sArWakaweV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sileV"><i>sileV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="suppawwigeV"><i>suppawwigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="seVjjeV"><i>seVjjeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sEraNeV"><i>sEraNeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sOxeV"><i>sOxeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hakkarikeV"><i>hakkarikeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hawwugeV"><i>hawwugeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="harigeV"><i>harigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hAxigeV"><i>hAxigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hikkeV"><i>hikkeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hulleV"><i>hulleV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="heVdigeV"><i>heVdigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hesigeV"><i>hesigeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hoVdeV"><i>hoVdeV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hoVleVmaneV"><i>hoVleVmaneV</i><par n="AcaraNeV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vaniweV"><i>vaniweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="abaleV"><i>abaleV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="abbeV"><i>abbeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ayxeV"><i>ayxeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="abaci"><i>abaci</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyaBicAriNi"><i>vyaBicAriNi</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SaraNeV"><i>SaraNeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SilAbAlikeV"><i>SilAbAlikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="awwigeV"><i>awwigeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="awweV"><i>awweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aXyApikeV"><i>aXyApikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAraxeV"><i>SAraxeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SiveV"><i>SiveV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aMbeV"><i>aMbeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="AryeV"><i>AryeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maxanikeV"><i>maxanikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mahilYeV"><i>mahilYeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAweV"><i>mAweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAnyeV"><i>mAnyeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muguxeV"><i>muguxeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mugxeV"><i>mugxeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muwwExeV"><i>muwwExeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rameV"><i>rameV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rasikeV"><i>rasikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="leKakeV"><i>leKakeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vqxXeV"><i>vqxXeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="veSyeV"><i>veSyeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SaraNeV"><i>SaraNeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAraxeV"><i>SAraxeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SilAbAlikeV"><i>SilAbAlikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SiveV"><i>SiveV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sIweV"><i>sIweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sUlYeV"><i>sUlYeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hadabeV"><i>hadabeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kannikeV"><i>kannikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kanyeV"><i>kanyeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="karNikeV"><i>karNikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAMweV"><i>kAMweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kubjeV"><i>kubjeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="caMcaleV"><i>caMcaleV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ceVluveV"><i>ceVluveV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xayiweV"><i>xayiweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nalleV"><i>nalleV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAyikeV"><i>nAyikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pawivraweV"><i>pawivraweV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="paricArikeV"><i>paricArikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="priyawameV"><i>priyawameV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="priyeV"><i>priyeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bAlikeV"><i>bAlikeV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bAleV"><i>bAleV</i><par n="vaniweV/_n"/></e>
